New York, session 2025-2026, S2594.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation or order to the 2 contrary, any public school located in a city with a population of one 3 million or more shall provide a remote learning option to all primary 4 and secondary students when such public school is located in a county 5 determined by the federal centers for disease control and prevention to 6 have a substantial or high level of community transmission of any 7 illness deemed by the federal centers for disease control and prevention 8 to be an outbreak. Such remote learning option shall remain available 9 until the federal centers for disease control and prevention determines 10 that community transmission in such county is at a low or moderate 11 level. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05982-02-5